Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.035

Applicant for license as funeral director or embalmer—Eligibility.

(1) An applicant for a license as a funeral director shall be at least eighteen years of age and must have obtained an associate of arts degree in mortuary science or completed a course of not less than two years in an accredited college, and a one-year course of training under a licensed funeral director in this state. The applicant must also pass an examination in the funeral arts and an examination in the laws of this state pertaining to the handling, care, transportation, and disposition of human remains and the contents of this chapter.

(2) An applicant for a license as an embalmer must be at least eighteen years of age and have obtained an associate of arts degree in mortuary science or completed a course of instruction in an accredited mortuary science college program and other college courses that total sixty semester hours or ninety quarter hours, completed a two-year course of training under a licensed embalmer in this state, and have passed an examination in the funeral sciences and an examination in the laws of this state pertaining to the handling, care, transportation, and disposition of human remains, and the contents of this chapter.

[ 2005 c 365 s 3; 1996 c 217 s 1; 1981 c 43 s 3.]